test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-njuaeqmmmel_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - njuäʹmmel contract stem jänis: # Noun - full paradigm
     njuäʹmmel+N+Sg+Nom: njuäʹmˈmel
     njuäʹmmel+N+Sg+Gen: njuäʹmˈmel
     njuäʹmmel+N+Sg+Acc: njuäʹmˈmel
     njuäʹmmel+N+Sg+Ill: njuäʹmˈmla
     njuäʹmmel+N+Sg+Loc: njuäʹmˈmlest
     njuäʹmmel+N+Sg+Com: njuäʹmˈmlin
     njuäʹmmel+N+Ess: njuäʹmˈmlen
     njuäʹmmel+N+Par: njuäʹmˈmled
     njuäʹmmel+N+Sg+Abe: [njuäʹmˈmeltaa, njuäʹmˈmeltää]
     njuäʹmmel+N+Pl+Nom: njuäʹmˈmel
     njuäʹmmel+N+Pl+Gen: njuäʹmˈmli
     njuäʹmmel+N+Pl+Acc: njuäʹmˈmlid
     njuäʹmmel+N+Pl+Ill: njuäʹmˈmlid
     njuäʹmmel+N+Pl+Loc: njuäʹmˈmlin
     njuäʹmmel+N+Pl+Com: njuäʹmˈmlivuiʹm
     njuäʹmmel+N+Pl+Abe: [njuäʹmˈmlitaa, njuäʹmˈmlitää]
     
